Utah statutes.
63J-4-202.   Appointment of director, state planning coordinator, and inspector general of Medicaid Services.

(1) (a)  The governor shall appoint, to serve at the governor's pleasure:

(i)  a director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget; and

(ii)  a state planning coordinator.

(b)  The state planning coordinator is considered part of the office for purposes of administration.

(2)  The governor shall establish the director's salary within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.

(3) (a)  In accordance with Section 63J-4a-201, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the Senate, the inspector general of the Office of Inspector General of Medicaid Services.

(b)  The Office of Inspector General of Medicaid Services is considered part of the office for purposes of administration.



Amended by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

